Nevada, session 83, SB133.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada Center for Civic Engagement for the
purpose of supporting civics education programs, including, without
limitation, National History Day, Civics in Action Summit,
KidsVention and We the People: The Citizen and the Constitution
Program, in Nevada’s elementary, junior high, middle and high
schools and to expand civics education programs for adults, the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $250,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $250,000
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the Nevada Center for Civic Engagement agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Nevada
Center for Civic Engagement through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Nevada
Center for Civic Engagement through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the Nevada Center for Civic Engagement, regardless
of their form or location, that the Legislative Auditor deems
necessary to conduct an audit of the use of the money appropriated
pursuant to subsection 1.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)